Utah statutes.
17-18a-603.   Legislative functions.

The attorney:

(1)  may review a state statute;

(2)  shall review each county ordinance;

(3)  shall call to the attention of the state Legislature or the county legislative body any defect in the operation of the law; and

(4)  shall suggest and assist in presenting an amendment to correct the defect.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

